Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 28.6 The Edward O. Hawkins and Thomas C. Slater Medical Marijuana Act
21-28.6-14.
Cooperative cultivations.

Two (2) or more qualifying cardholders may cooperatively cultivate marijuana in residential or nonresidential locations subject to the following restrictions:

Effective January 1, 2017, cooperative cultivations shall apply to the department of business regulation for a license to operate;

A registered patient or primary caregiver cardholder can only cultivate in one location, including participation in a cooperative cultivation;

No single location may have more than one cooperative cultivation. For the purposes of this section, location means one structural building, not units within a structural building;

The cooperative cultivation shall not be visible from the street or other public areas;

A written acknowledgement of the limitations of the right to use and possess marijuana for medical purposes in Rhode Island that is signed by each cardholder and is displayed prominently in the premises cooperative cultivation;

Cooperative cultivations are restricted to the following possession limits:

A nonresidential cooperative cultivation may have no more than ten ounces (10 oz.) of dried marijuana, or its equivalent which satisfies the requirements of this chapter, and an amount of wet marijuana set in regulations promulgated by the departments of health and business regulation, forty-eight (48) mature marijuana plants, and forty-eight (48) seedlings;

A residential cooperative cultivation may have no more than ten ounces (10 oz.) of dried marijuana, or its equivalent which satisfies the requirements of this chapter, and an amount of wet marijuana set in regulations promulgated by the departments of health and business regulation, twenty-four (24) mature marijuana plants, and twenty-four (24) seedlings;

A nonresidential or residential cooperative cultivation must have displayed prominently on the premises its license issued by the department of business regulation;

Every marijuana plant possessed by a cooperative cultivation must be accompanied by a valid medical marijuana tag issued by the department of business regulation pursuant to §

21-28.6-15

. Each cooperative cultivation must purchase at least one medical marijuana tag in order to remain a licensed cooperative cultivation; and

Cooperative cultivations are subject to reasonable inspection by the department of business regulation for the purposes of enforcing regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter and all applicable Rhode Island general laws.

Cooperative cultivations must be inspected as follows:

A nonresidential cooperative cultivation must have displayed prominently on the premises documentation from the municipality where the single location is located that the location and the cultivation has been inspected by the municipal building and/or zoning official and the municipal fire department and is in compliance with any applicable state or municipal housing and zoning codes; and

A residential cooperative cultivation must have displayed prominently on the premises an affidavit by a licensed electrician that the cultivation has been inspected and is in compliance with any applicable state or municipal housing and zoning codes for the municipality where the cooperative cultivation is located.

Cooperative cultivations must report the location of the cooperative cultivation to the department of public safety.

The reports provided to the department of public safety in subsection (8) of this section shall be confidential, but locations may be confirmed for law enforcement purposes. The report of the location of the cooperative cultivation alone shall not constitute probable cause for a search of the cooperative cultivation.

The department of business regulation shall promulgate regulations governing the licensing and operation of cooperative cultivations, and may promulgate regulations that set a fee for a cooperative cultivation license.

Any violation of any provision of this chapter or regulations promulgated hereunder as determined by the department of business regulation may result in the revocation/suspension of the cooperative cultivation license.

License required. No person or entity shall engage in activities described in this section without a cooperative cultivation license issued by the department of business regulation.

Effective July 1, 2019, except as to cooperative cultivator licenses issued by the department of business regulation before July 1, 2019, the department of business regulation shall no longer accept applications or renewals for licensed cooperative cultivations and cooperative cultivations shall no longer be permitted.

Effective July 1, 2019, not more than one registered cardholder shall be permitted to grow marijuana in a dwelling unit or commercial unit, except for two (2) or more qualifying patient or primary caregiver cardholder(s) who are primary residents of the same dwelling unit where the medical marijuana plants are grown and in all instances subject to the plant limits provided in §

21-28.6-4(r)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 515, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 5.

21-28.6-15.
Medical marijuana plant tags.

Effective January 1, 2017, the department of business regulation shall make medical marijuana tag sets available for purchase. Effective April 1, 2017, every marijuana plant, either mature or immature, grown by a registered patient or primary caregiver, must be accompanied by a physical medical marijuana tag issued by the department of business regulation to qualifying patients and primary caregivers. Effective December 1, 2022, all medical marijuana tag sets shall be provided without charge to patient cardholders and/or primary caregivers authorized to grow medical cannabis. The commission by rule and regulation may specify, alter or amend the method or manner of issuance of tags; however, all issuance of tags after December 1, 2022, shall be without charge to patient cardholders and/or primary caregivers authorized to grow medical cannabis.

The department of business regulation shall charge an annual fee for each medical marijuana tag set that shall include one tag for a mature medical marijuana plant and one tag for an immature plant. If the required fee has not been paid, those medical marijuana tags shall be considered expired and invalid.

[Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 5 and P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 5.]

Effective January 1, 2019, and thereafter, the department of business regulation shall verify with the department of health that all medical marijuana tags provided to registered patient cardholders, who have notified the department of health of their election to grow medical marijuana, or primary caregiver cardholders. The department of health shall provide this verification according to qualifying patients’ and primary caregivers’ registry identification numbers and without providing access to any applications or supporting information submitted by qualifying patients to protect patient confidentiality.

The department of business regulation shall maintain information pertaining to medical marijuana tags.

All primary caregivers shall acquire at least one medical marijuana tag set for each patient under their care and all patients growing medical marijuana for themselves shall purchase at least one medical marijuana tag set.

All licensed medical marijuana cultivators shall acquire at least one medical marijuana tag set or utilize a seed-to-sale tracking system.

The department of business regulation shall promulgate regulations to establish a process by which medical marijuana tags may be returned. The department of business regulation may choose to reimburse a portion or the entire amount of any fees paid for medical marijuana tags that are subsequently returned.

Enforcement until issuance of final rules and regulations by the commission pursuant to chapter 28.11 of title 21:

If a patient cardholder, primary caregiver cardholder, licensed compassion center, or licensed medical marijuana cultivator violates any provision of this chapter or the regulations promulgated hereunder as determined by the departments of business regulation or health, his or her medical marijuana tags may be revoked. In addition, the cardholder’s registration or the license may revoke the cardholder’s registration or license.

The department of business regulation may revoke and not reissue, pursuant to regulations, medical marijuana tags to any cardholder or licensee who is convicted of; placed on probation; whose case is filed pursuant to §

12-10-12

where the defendant pleads nolo contendere; or whose case is deferred pursuant to §

12-19-19

where the defendant pleads nolo contendere for any felony offense under chapter 28 of this title (“Rhode Island controlled substances act”) or a similar offense from any other jurisdiction.

If a patient cardholder, primary caregiver cardholder, licensed cooperative cultivation, compassion center, licensed medical marijuana cultivator, or any other person or entity is found to have marijuana plants, or marijuana material without valid medical marijuana tags sets or which are not tracked in accordance with regulation, the department of business regulation shall impose an administrative penalty in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department on the patient cardholder, primary caregiver cardholder, licensed cooperative cultivation, compassion center, licensed medical marijuana cultivator, or other person or entity for each untagged marijuana plant or unit of untracked marijuana material.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 5].

Enforcement after issuance of final rules and regulations by the commission:

If a patient cardholder, primary caregiver cardholder, licensed compassion center, or licensed medical marijuana cultivator violates any provision of this chapter or the regulations promulgated hereunder as determined by the commission, his or her medical marijuana tags may be revoked. In addition, the cardholder’s registration or license may be revoked.

The commission may revoke and not reissue, pursuant to regulations, medical marijuana tags to any cardholder or licensee who is convicted of; placed on probation; whose case is filed pursuant to §

12-10-12

where the defendant pleads nolo contendere; or whose case is deferred pursuant to §

12-19-19

where the defendant pleads nolo contendere for any felony offense under chapter 28 of this title (“Rhode Island controlled substances act”) or a similar offense from any other jurisdiction.

If a patient cardholder, primary caregiver cardholder, licensed cooperative cultivation, compassion center, licensed medical marijuana cultivator, or any other person or entity is found to have marijuana plants, or marijuana material without valid medical marijuana tags sets or which are not tracked in accordance with regulation, the commission shall impose an administrative penalty in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commission on the patient cardholder, primary caregiver cardholder, licensed cooperative cultivation, compassion center, licensed medical marijuana cultivator, or other person or entity for each untagged marijuana plant or unit of untracked marijuana material.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 14, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 5; P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 5, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 5, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.6-16.
Licensed medical marijuana cultivators.

A licensed medical marijuana cultivator licensed under this section may acquire, possess, manufacture, cultivate, deliver, or transfer medical marijuana to licensed compassion centers, to another licensed medical marijuana cultivator. A licensed medical marijuana cultivator shall not be a primary caregiver cardholder registered with any qualifying patient(s) and shall not hold a cooperative cultivation license. Except as specifically provided to the contrary, all provisions of this chapter (the Edward O. Hawkins and Thomas C. Slater medical marijuana act), apply to a licensed medical marijuana cultivator unless they conflict with a provision contained in this section.

Licensing of medical marijuana cultivators — Department of business regulation authority. The department of business regulation shall promulgate regulations governing the manner in which it shall consider applications for the licensing of medical marijuana cultivators, including regulations governing:

The form and content of licensing and renewal applications;

Minimum oversight requirements for licensed medical marijuana cultivators;

Minimum record-keeping requirements for cultivators;

Minimum security requirements for cultivators; and

Procedures for suspending, revoking, or terminating the license of cultivators who or that violate the provisions of this section or the regulations promulgated pursuant to this subsection.

A licensed medical marijuana cultivator license issued by the department of business regulation shall expire one year after it was issued and the licensed medical marijuana cultivator may apply for renewal with the department in accordance with its regulations pertaining to licensed medical marijuana cultivators.

The department of business regulation shall promulgate regulations that govern how many marijuana plants, mature and immature; how much wet marijuana; and how much usable marijuana a licensed medical marijuana cultivator may possess. Every marijuana plant possessed by a licensed medical marijuana cultivator must be accompanied by a valid medical marijuana tag issued by the department of business regulation pursuant to §

21-28.6-15

or catalogued in a seed-to-sale inventory tracking system in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department of business regulation.

Medical marijuana cultivators shall only sell marijuana to compassion centers, another licensed medical marijuana cultivator. All marijuana possessed by a cultivator in excess of the possession limit established pursuant to subsection (d) of this section shall be under formal agreement to be purchased by a marijuana establishment. If the excess marijuana is not under formal agreement to be purchased, the cultivator will have a period of time, specified in regulations promulgated by the department of business regulation, to sell or destroy that excess marijuana. The department may suspend and/or revoke the cultivator’s license and the license of any officer, director, employee, or agent of the cultivator and/or impose an administrative penalty in accordance with the regulations promulgated by the department for any violation of this section or the regulations. In addition, any violation of this section or the regulations promulgated pursuant to this subsection and subsection (d) of this section shall cause a licensed medical marijuana cultivator to lose the protections described in subsection (m) of this section and may subject the licensed medical marijuana cultivator to arrest and prosecution under Chapter 28 of this title (the Rhode Island controlled substances act).

Medical marijuana cultivators shall be subject to any regulations promulgated by the department of health or department of business regulation that specify how marijuana must be tested for items, including, but not limited to, potency, cannabinoid profile, and contaminants.

Medical marijuana cultivators shall be subject to any product labeling requirements promulgated by the department of business regulation and the department of health.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the general laws, the manufacture of marijuana using a solvent extraction process that includes the use of a compressed, flammable gas as a solvent by a licensed medical marijuana cultivator shall not be subject to the protections of this chapter.

Medical marijuana cultivators shall only be licensed to grow marijuana at a single location registered with the department of business regulation and the department of public safety. The department of business regulation may promulgate regulations governing where cultivators are allowed to grow. Medical marijuana cultivators must abide by all local ordinances, including zoning ordinances.

Inspection. Medical marijuana cultivators shall be subject to reasonable inspection by the department of business regulation or the department of health for the purposes of enforcing regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter and all applicable Rhode Island general laws.

The cultivator applicant, unless he or she is an employee with no equity, ownership, financial interest, or managing control, shall apply to the bureau of criminal identification of the department of attorney general, department of public safety division of state police, or local police department for a national criminal records check that shall include fingerprints submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Upon the discovery of any disqualifying information as defined in subsection (k)(2) of this section, and in accordance with the rules promulgated by the director of the department of business regulation, the bureau of criminal identification of the department of attorney general, department of public safety division of state police, or the local police department shall inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the disqualifying information; and, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information, shall notify the department of business regulation, in writing, that disqualifying information has been discovered.

In those situations in which no disqualifying information has been found, the bureau of criminal identification of the department of attorney general, department of public safety division of state police, or the local police department shall inform the applicant and the department of business regulation, in writing, of this fact.

Information produced by a national criminal records check pertaining to a conviction for a felony drug offense or a plea of nolo contendere for a felony drug offense and received a sentence of probation shall result in a letter to the applicant and the department of business regulation disqualifying the applicant.

Except for employees with no ownership, equity, financial interest, or managing control of a marijuana establishment license, the cultivator applicant shall be responsible for any expense associated with the national criminal records check.

Persons issued medical marijuana cultivator licenses shall be subject to the following:

A licensed medical marijuana cultivator cardholder shall notify and request approval from the department of business regulation of any change in his or her name or address within ten (10) days of the change. A cultivator cardholder who fails to notify the department of business regulation of any of these changes is responsible for a civil infraction, punishable by a fine of no more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

When a licensed medical marijuana cultivator cardholder notifies the department of business regulation of any changes listed in this subsection (l), the department of business regulation shall issue the cultivator cardholder a new registry identification card after the department approves the changes and receives from the licensee payment of a fee specified in regulation.

If a licensed medical marijuana cultivator cardholder loses his or her card, he or she shall notify the department of business regulation and submit a fee specified in regulation within ten (10) days of losing the card. The department of business regulation shall issue a new card with a new random identification number.

A licensed medical marijuana cultivator cardholder shall notify the department of business regulation of any disqualifying criminal convictions as defined in subsection (k)(2) of this section. The department of business regulation may choose to suspend and/or revoke his or her card after the notification.

If a licensed medical marijuana cultivator or cultivator cardholder violates any provision of this chapter or regulations promulgated hereunder as determined by the department of business regulation, his or her card and the issued license may be suspended and/or revoked.

Immunity:

No licensed medical marijuana cultivator shall be subject to: prosecution; search, except by the departments pursuant to subsection (j) of this section; seizure; or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, solely for acting in accordance with this section.

No licensed medical marijuana cultivator shall be subject to prosecution, seizure, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, for selling, giving, or distributing marijuana in whatever form and within the limits established by the department of business regulation to a licensed compassion center.

No principal officers, board members, agents, volunteers, or employees of a licensed medical marijuana cultivator shall be subject to arrest, prosecution, search, seizure, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, solely for working for or with a licensed medical marijuana cultivator to engage in acts permitted by this section.

No state employee shall be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty, disciplinary action, termination, or loss of employee or pension benefits, for any and all conduct that occurs within the scope of his or her employment regarding the administration, execution, and/or enforcement of this act, and the provisions of §§

9-31-8

and

9-31-9

shall be applicable to this section.

License required. No person or entity shall engage in activities described in this section without a medical marijuana cultivator license issued by the department of business regulation.

Effective July 1, 2019, the department of business regulation will not reopen the application period for new medical marijuana cultivator licenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 14, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 5.

21-28.6-16.1.
Reserved.

21-28.6-16.2.
Cannabis testing laboratories — Immunity.

No cannabis testing laboratory shall be subject to prosecution; search (except by the departments pursuant to regulations); seizure; or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, solely for acting in accordance with the act and regulations promulgated hereunder to assist licensees.

No cannabis testing laboratory shall be subject to prosecution, search (except by the departments pursuant to regulations), seizure, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action, by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, for selling, giving, or distributing marijuana in whatever form, and within the limits established by, the department of health to another cannabis testing laboratory.

No principal officers, board members, agents, volunteers, or employees of a cannabis testing laboratory shall be subject to arrest, prosecution, search, seizure, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, solely for working for or with a cannabis testing laboratory to engage in acts permitted by the act and the regulations promulgated hereunder.

No state employee shall be subject to arrest, prosecution or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty, disciplinary action, termination, or loss of employee or pension benefits, for any and all conduct that occurs within the scope of his or her employment regarding the administration, execution and/or enforcement of this act, and the provisions of §§

9-31-8

and

9-31-9

shall be applicable to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 14, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 5.

21-28.6-17.
Revenue.

Effective July 1, 2016, except for the one hundred twenty-five thousand dollar ($125,000) fee paid by hybrid cannabis retailers pursuant to §

21-28.11-10

, all fees collected by the departments of health and business regulation from applicants, registered patients, primary caregivers, authorized purchasers, licensed medical marijuana cultivators, cooperative cultivations, compassion centers, other licensees licensed pursuant to this chapter, and compassion-center and other registry identification cardholders shall be placed in restricted-receipt accounts to support the state’s medical marijuana program, including but not limited to, payment of expenses incurred for the administration of the program. The restricted-receipt account will be known as the “medical marijuana licensing account” and will be housed within the budgets of the departments of business regulation and health until final issuance of rules and regulations by the commission, at which time said account shall be housed within the budget of the commission.

All revenues remaining in the restricted-receipt accounts after payments specified in subsection (a) of this section shall first be paid to cover any existing deficit in the department of health’s restricted-receipt account or the department of business regulation’s restricted-receipt account. These transfers shall be made annually on the last business day of the fiscal year until final issuance of rules and regulations of the commission, at which time the revenues subject to this subsection shall be used to cover any existing deficit in the commission’s budget.

All revenues remaining in the restricted-receipt accounts after payments specified in subsections (a) and (b) shall be paid into the state’s general fund. These payments shall be made annually on the last business day of the fiscal year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 14, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 5; P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 5, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 5, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.6-18.
Activities not exempt.

The provisions of this chapter do not exempt any person from arrest, civil or criminal penalty, seizure or forfeiture of assets, discipline by any state or local licensing board or authority, and state prosecution for, nor may they establish an affirmative defense based on this chapter to charges arising from, any of the following acts:

Driving, operating, or being in actual physical control of a vehicle or a vessel under power or sail while impaired by marijuana or marijuana products;

Possessing or using marijuana or marijuana products if the person is a prisoner;

Possessing or using marijuana or marijuana products in any local detention facility, county jail, state prison, reformatory, or other correctional facility, including, without limitation, any facility for the detention of juvenile offenders; or

Manufacturing or processing of marijuana products with the use of prohibited solvents, in violation of this chapter; or

Possessing, using, distributing, cultivating, processing or manufacturing marijuana or marijuana products which do not satisfy the requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 6.

21-28.6-19.
Transfer of powers.

Upon final issuance of rules and regulations by the cannabis control commission pursuant to the provisions of chapter 28.11 of title 21, including, but not limited to, §

21-28.11-18

, all powers, and duties, rulemaking authority, hearings, enforcement actions and administrative responsibilities and duties of the department of business regulation and department of environmental management with respect to this chapter shall be transferred to the cannabis control commission established pursuant to §

21-28.11-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 6, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 6, effective May 25, 2022.